Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.351

License suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

The director shall immediately suspend the license of any broker or managing broker who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as an individual who is not in compliance with a support order or a visitation order. If the individual has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the individual is in compliance with the order.

[ 2008 c 23 s 31; 1997 c 58 s 826. Formerly RCW 18.85.227.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.